California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
(d) This section shall remain in effect only until the commission certifies to the Secretary of State that construction is complete on the project on Route 80 in Contra Costa County to convert the existing shoulder to additional traffic lanes, and as of the date of that certification is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1009, Sec. 1.   Repealed as of date prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

381.

Route 81 is from Route 215 east of Riverside to Route 15 south of Devore.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 681, Sec. 65.3.)
-------------------------------------------

382.

(a) Route 82 is from Route 880 in San Jose to Route 280 in San Francisco.

(b) The relinquished former portion of Route 82 within the City of San Jose is not a state highway and is not eligible for adoption under Section 81. For the relinquished former portion of Route 82, the City of San Jose shall maintain within its jurisdiction signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 82 and shall ensure the continuity of traffic flow on the relinquished former portion of Route 82, including any traffic signal progression. The city may apply to the department for approval of a business route designation in accordance with Chapter 20, Topic 21, of the Highway Design Manual.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 523, Sec. 13.   (SB 788)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

383.

(a) Route 83 is from Route 71 to Route 10 near the City of Upland.

(b) The relinquished former portion of Route 83 within the City of Upland is not a state highway. For the relinquished former portion of Route 83, the City of Upland shall ensure the continuity of traffic flow, including any traffic signal progression, and maintain signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 83.

(c) (1) Upon a determination by the commission
 that it is in the best interests of the state to do so, the commission may, upon terms and conditions approved by it, relinquish to the City of Ontario all or a portion of Route 83 within its jurisdiction, if the department and the city enter into an agreement providing for that relinquishment.

(2) The following conditions apply upon relinquishment:

(A) The relinquishment shall become effective on the date following the county recorder’s recordation of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(B) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, the relinquished portion of Route 83 shall cease to be a state highway.

(d) (1) Upon a determination by the commission that it is in the best interests of the state to do so, the commission may, upon terms and conditions approved by it, relinquish to the City of Chino all or a portion of Route 83 within its jurisdiction, if the department and the city enter into an agreement providing for that relinquishment.

(2) The following conditions apply upon relinquishment:

(A) The relinquishment shall become effective on the date following the county recorder’s recordation of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(B) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, the relinquished portion of Route 83 shall cease to be a state highway.

(e) The entirety of Route 83 relinquished under this section is ineligible for future adoption under Section 81.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 516, Sec. 1.   (AB 250)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

384.

(a) Route 84 is from:

(1) Route 1 near San Gregorio to Route 101 at Woodside Road in Redwood City.

(2) Route 101 at Marsh Road in Menlo Park to Route 880.

(3) Route 880 to Route 238.

(4) Route 238 to Route 680 near Scotts Corners via the vicinity of Sunol.

(5) Route 680 near Scotts Corners to Route 580 in Livermore.

(6) Route 580 in Livermore to Route 4 near Brentwood.

(7) Route 12 at
 Rio Vista to the southerly city limit of the City of West Sacramento.

(b) The relinquished former portion of Route 84 within the City of West Sacramento is not a state highway and is not eligible for adoption under Section 81. For the relinquished former portion of Route 84, the City of West Sacramento shall maintain signs within its jurisdictions directing motorists to the continuation of Route 84.

(c) (1) The commission may relinquish to the City of Fremont the portion of Route 84 within its city limits between Route 880, approximately postmile 6.922, and Route 238 Mission Boulevard, approximately postmile 10.83, upon terms and conditions the commission finds to be in the best interests of the state, if the department and the city enter into an agreement providing for that relinquishment.

(2) A relinquishment under this subdivision shall become effective on the date following the county recorder’s recordation of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(3) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, all of the following shall occur:

(A) The relinquished portion of Route 84 shall cease to be a state highway.

(B) The relinquished portion of Route 84 shall be ineligible for future adoption under Section 81.

(C) For the relinquished portion of Route 84, the City of Fremont shall maintain signs within its jurisdiction directing motorists to the continuation of Route 84.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 264.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

384.1.

The inclusion of Route 84 from Route 238 to Route 680 near Sunol in the state scenic highway system pursuant to Section 263.5 does not prohibit the use of railroad rights-of-way located in that scenic corridor for transportation purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 427, Sec. 163.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

385.

Route 85 is from Route 101 near Bernal Road in San Jose to Route 101 near Moffett Boulevard in Mountain View.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 106, Sec. 22.   Effective May 13, 1988.   Operative January 1, 1989, by Sec. 31 of Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

386.

(a) Route 86 is from:

(1) Route 111 to Route 8 near El Centro.

(2) Route 8 near El Centro to the southern limit of the City of Imperial.

(3) The northern limit of the City of Imperial to Route 10 in the City of Indio via the vicinity of City of Brawley.

(b) Upon a determination by the commission that it is in the best interests of the state to do so, the commission may, upon terms and conditions approved by it, relinquish the following portions of Route 86, if the department and the applicable local agency enter
 into an agreement providing for that relinquishment, as follows:

(1) To the County of Imperial, the portions of Route 86 within unincorporated areas of the county from the beginning of the route at the junction of Route 111 to 0.5 mile south of Fredricks Road.

(2) To the City of El Centro, the portion of Route 86 within its city limits.

(3) To the City of Brawley, the portion of Route 86 within its city limits.

(c) The following conditions shall apply upon relinquishment:

(1) The relinquishment shall become effective on the date following the county recorder’s recordation of the relinquishment resolution
 containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(2) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, the relinquished portions of Route 86 shall cease to be a state highway.

(3) The portions of Route 86 relinquished under this subdivision shall be ineligible for future adoption under Section 81.

(4) The Cities of Brawley and El Centro, and the County of Imperial, shall ensure the continuity of traffic flow on the relinquished portions of Route 86, including any traffic signal progression.

(5) For the portions of Route 86 that are relinquished under this subdivision, the Cities of Brawley and El Centro, and the County of
 Imperial, shall install and maintain, within their respective jurisdictions, the city or county signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 86 to the extent deemed necessary by the department.

(d) Following the relinquishments authorized in subdivision (b), the portion of Route 86 from 0.5 mile south of Fredricks Road to the north junction of Route 78 shall be redesignated as a part of Route 78.

(e) The relinquished former portion of Route 86 within the City of Imperial is not a state highway and is not eligible for adoption under Section 81. For the relinquished former portion of Route 86, the City of Imperial shall install and maintain within its jurisdiction signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 86 to the extent deemed necessary by the department.
 The City of Imperial shall ensure the continuity of traffic flow on the relinquished portion of Route 86 within its jurisdiction, including any traffic signal progression.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 198, Sec. 7.   (AB 3246)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

387.

Route 87 is from:

(a) Route 85 in the vicinity of Santa Teresa Boulevard to Route 101 in the vicinity of Guadalupe River.

(b) San Jose easterly of Route 101 to Route 237.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 106, Sec. 23.   Effective May 13, 1988.   Operative January 1, 1989, by Sec. 31 of Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

388.

Route 88 is from:

(a) Route 99 near Stockton to Route 49 passing south of Ione.

(b) Route 49 in Jackson to the Nevada state line via Pine Grove, Silver Lake, and Kirkwood.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 928, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

389.

Route 89 is from:

(a) Route 395 near Coleville to Route 88 via the vicinity of Markleeville.

(b) Route 88 near Picketts Junction to Route 50 near Meyers.

(c) Route 50 near May’s Junction to Route 80 via Tallac, Emerald Bay, McKinney’s, Tahoe City, and the Truckee River.

(d) Route 80 near Truckee to Route 70 near Blairsden.

(e) Route 70 near Indian Falls to Route 36 near Deer Creek Pass.

(f) Route 36 near Morgan Summit to Lassen Volcanic National Park.

(g) Route 44 to Route 5 near Mt. Shasta.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 928, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

390.

(a) Route 90 is from Route 1 northwest of the Los Angeles International Airport to Route 91 in Santa Ana Canyon passing near La Habra, except for the portion within the city limits of Yorba Linda.

(b) The relinquished former portion of Route 90 within the City of Yorba Linda is not a state highway and is not eligible for adoption under Section 81.

(c) The City of Yorba Linda shall ensure the continuity of traffic flow on the relinquished former portion of Route 90, including any traffic signal progression.

(d) For the relinquished former portion of Route 90, the City of Yorba Linda shall maintain signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 90.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 525, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

391.

Route 91 is from:

(a) Vermont Avenue at the eastern city limits of Gardena to Route 215 in Riverside via Santa Ana Canyon.

(b) The relinquished former portions of Route 91 in the Cities of Gardena, Torrance, Lawndale, Redondo Beach, Manhattan Beach, and Hermosa Beach are not a state highway and are not eligible for adoption under Section 81.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 525, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

392.

(a) Route 92 is from:

(1) Route 1 near Half Moon Bay to Route 280.

(2) Route 280 to Route 238 in Hayward.

(b) The relinquished former portion of Route 92 within the City of Hayward is not a state highway and is not eligible for adoption under Section 81. For the relinquished former portion of Route 92, the City of Hayward shall maintain within its jurisdiction signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 92 or to the state highway system, as applicable.

(c) (1) The commission may relinquish to the City of Hayward all or any
 portion of Route 92 located within the city limits of that city, upon terms and conditions the commission finds to be in the best interests of the state, if the department and the city enter into an agreement providing for that relinquishment.

(2) A relinquishment under this subdivision shall become effective immediately after the county recorder’s recordation of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(3) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, both of the following shall occur:

(A) The portion of Route 92 relinquished shall cease to be a state highway.

(B) The portion of Route 92 relinquished shall be ineligible for future adoption under Section 81.

(4) For relinquished portions of Route 92, the City of Hayward shall maintain signs within its jurisdiction directing motorists to the continuation of Route 92 or to the state highway system, as applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 451, Sec. 13.   (SB 491)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

393.

Route 93 is from:

(a) Route 77 near Moraga to Route 24 near Orinda.

(b) Route 24 near Orinda to Route 80 in Richmond and Pinole.

(c) Route 80 to Route 580 in Richmond via San Pablo and north Richmond.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 106, Sec. 24.   Effective May 13, 1988.   Operative January 1, 1989, by Sec. 31 of Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

394.

Route 94 is from Route 5 near San Diego to Route 8 west of Jacumba via Campo.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

395.

Route 95 is from:

(a) Route 10 near Blythe to Route 40 near Needles.

(b) Route 40 west of Needles northerly to the Nevada state line.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

396.

Route 96 is from Route 299 near Willow Creek via the vicinity of Weitchpec to Route 5 near the confluence of the Shasta and Klamath Rivers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 409, Sec. 39.)
-------------------------------------------

397.

Route 97 is from Route 5 in Weed to the Oregon state line near Dorris.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 409, Sec. 40.)
-------------------------------------------

398.

Route 98 is from Route 8 near Coyote Wells to Route 8 via Calexico.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

399.

Route 99 is from:

(a) Route 5 south of Bakersfield to Route 50 in Sacramento.

(b) Route 5 in Sacramento to Route 36 near Red Bluff, passing near Catlett and Tudor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 106, Sec. 25.   Effective May 13, 1988.   Operative January 1, 1989, by Sec. 31 of Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

400.

Route 100 is from the junction of Routes 1 and 17 to Route 1 west of the San Lorenzo River via the beach area in Santa Cruz.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

401.

Route 101 is from:

(a) Route 5 near Seventh Street in Los Angeles to Route 1, Funston approach, and, subject to Section 72.1, the approach to the Golden Gate Bridge in the Presidio of San Francisco via Santa Barbara, San Luis Obispo, and Salinas.

(b) A point in Marin County opposite San Francisco to the Oregon state line via Crescent City.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 559, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

402.

Route 102 is from Route 5 near Elkhorn to Route 80 near Auburn.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

403.

Route 103 is from Route 47 in Los Angeles to Route 1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 928, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

404.

Route 104 is from:

(a) Route 99 near Arno to Route 88 near Ione.

(b) Route 88 west of Martell to Route 88 southwest of Pine Grove via the vicinity of Sutter Creek.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 409, Sec. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

405.

Route 105 is from Pershing Drive near El Segundo to Route 605.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1243, Sec. 36.   Effective September 30, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

405.1.

The department may let, in an economically depressed area, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 135.4, and without competitive bidding, contracts for the maintenance of the portion of the right-of-way bounded by Imperial Highway, Alameda Street, 120th Street, and the Harbor Freeway (Route 110), and improvements thereon, acquired for Route 105 and for any other work necessary to insure that the right-of-way is kept in a safe and sanitary condition and does not become a blight in the community.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 292, Sec. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

407.

(a) Route 107 is from Route 1 in Torrance to the southern city limits of Lawndale.

(b) The relinquished former portion of Route 107 in the City of Lawndale is not a state highway and is not eligible for adoption under Section 81.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 525, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

407.5.

(a) The commission may relinquish to the City of Torrance the portion of Route 107 that is located within the city limits of the city, upon terms and conditions the commission finds to be in the best interests of the state.

(b) A relinquishment under this section shall become effective immediately following the recordation by the county recorder of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(c) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, both of the following shall occur:

(1) The portion of Route 107 relinquished under this section shall cease to be a state highway.

(2) The portion of Route 107 relinquished under this section may not be considered for future adoption under Section 81.

(d) The city shall ensure the continuity of traffic flow on the relinquished portion of Route 107, including, but not limited to, any traffic signal progression.

(e) For the portion of Route 107 that is relinquished, the city shall maintain within its jurisdiction signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 107.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 639, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

407.6.

(a) The commission may relinquish to the City of Redondo Beach the portion of Route 107 that is located within the city limits of the city, upon terms and conditions the commission finds to be in the best interests of the state.

(b) A relinquishment under this section shall become effective immediately following the recordation by the county recorder of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(c) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, all of the following shall occur:

(1) The portion of Route 107 relinquished under this
 section shall cease to be a state highway.

(2) The portion of Route 107 relinquished under this section may not be considered for future adoption under Section 81.

(3) The city shall ensure the continuity of traffic flow on the relinquished portion of Route 107, including, but not limited to, any traffic signal progression.

(4) For the portion of Route 107 that is relinquished, the city shall maintain within its jurisdiction signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 107.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 281, Sec. 1.   (AB 2254)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

408.

Route 108 is from:

(a) Route 5 near Crows Landing to Route 99 near Modesto.

(b) Route 132 in Modesto to Route 120 east of Oakdale.

(c) Route 120 near Yosemite Junction to Route 49 south of Jamestown.

(d) Route 49 south of Jamestown to Route 395 via the vicinity of Sonora and Long Barn.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 189, Sec. 4.   (SB 532)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

409.

(a) Route 109 is from Route 84 to Route 101.

(b) The department shall maintain and operate the segment of Route 109 within the City of East Palo Alto upon a determination by the department and the city that the segment is in an acceptable state of repair.

(c) No study and analysis of any proposed segment of Route 109 shall be conducted without the involvement of the governing body of any city or county through which the segment would pass as an active participant in the study and analysis. However, nothing in this subdivision shall preclude the department from conducting a study and analysis. Furthermore, no segment may be included in any plan for future Route 109 construction unless the segment is approved by each of those governing bodies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 277, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

410.

(a) Route 110 is from Route 47 in San Pedro to Glenarm Street in Pasadena.

(b) The relinquished former portions of Route 110 that are located between 9th Street and Gaffey Street in the City of Los Angeles and Glenarm Street and Colorado Boulevard in Pasadena are not state highways and are not eligible for adoption under Section 81. For the relinquished former portions of Route 110, the Cities of Los Angeles and Pasadena shall maintain within their respective jurisdictions signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 110 and shall ensure the continuity of traffic flow on the relinquished portion of Route 110, including any traffic signal
 progression.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 669) by Stats. 2012, Ch. 769, Sec. 24.   (AB 2679)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

411.

(a) Route 111 is from:

(1) The international border south of Calexico to Route 78 near Brawley, passing east of Heber.

(2) Route 78 near Brawley to Route 86 via the north shore of the Salton Sea.

(3) The western city limits of Cathedral City to Route 10 near Whitewater.

(b) The relinquished former portions of Route 111 within the unincorporated area of the County of Riverside and the Cities of Cathedral City, Coachella, Indian Wells, Indio, La Quinta, Palm Desert, and Rancho Mirage are not state highways
 and are not eligible for adoption under Section 81. For the relinquished former portions of Route 111, the County of Riverside and the Cities of Cathedral City, Coachella, Indian Wells, Indio, La Quinta, and Palm Desert, as applicable, shall maintain within their respective jurisdictions signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 111 and shall ensure the continuity of traffic flow on the relinquished portions of Route 111, including any traffic signal progression.

(c) (1) The commission may relinquish to the City of Palm Springs any portion, or the entirety, of Route 111 within its city limits, upon
 terms and conditions the commission finds to be in the best interests of the state, if the department and the city enter into an agreement providing for that relinquishment.

(2) A relinquishment under this subdivision shall become effective on the date following the county recorder’s recordation of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(3) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, all of the following shall occur:

(A) Any portion of Route 111 relinquished pursuant to this subdivision shall cease to be a state highway.

(B) Any portion of Route 111 relinquished
 pursuant to this subdivision shall be ineligible for future adoption under Section 81.

(C) For any portion of Route 111 relinquished pursuant to this subdivision, the City of Palm Springs shall maintain signs within its city limits directing motorists to the continuation of Route 111.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 433, Sec. 1.   (AB 2272)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

412.

Route 112 is from Route 61 to Route 185 in San Leandro.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

413.

Route 113 is from:

(a) Route 12 to Route 80 near Dixon.

(b) Route 80 near Davis to Route 99 passing near Woodland.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

414.

Route 114 is from Route 101 in East Palo Alto to Route 84.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1187, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

415.

Route 115 is from:

(a) Route 8 southeasterly of Holtville to Route 78.

(b) Route 78 east of Brawley to Route 111 at Calipatria.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 742.)
-------------------------------------------

416.

Route 116 is from:

(a) Route 1 near Jenner to Route 101 near Cotati.

(b) Route 101 near Petaluma to Route 121 near Schellville.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

418.

Route 118 is from:

(a) Route 126 near Saticoy to Route 210 near San Fernando.

(b) Route 210 near Sunland to Route 249 north of La Canada.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

418.3.

The commission is requested to grant high priority for construction on uncompleted portions of Route 118 for which no construction contract has been awarded, in order to enable the department to award other major construction contracts, so that construction may proceed without delay on the route until it is completed, unless precluded therefrom by any conditions beyond the department’s control.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

418.4.

In recognition of the fact that increased motor vehicle traffic uses Madera Road and Olsen Road in the City of Simi Valley to traverse between Routes 118 and 23, the department may pay up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) annually to the city for the added costs of maintenance and operation of those two roads. The payment shall be made from funds appropriated to the department for the maintenance of state highways.

This section shall become inoperative upon the department certifying that construction is complete on the 1985 State Transportation Improvement Program project on Route 23 in Ventura County which provides the freeway-to-freeway connection with Route 118.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1395, Sec. 1.   Inoperative on date prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

419.

Route 119 is from Route 33 at Taft to Route 99 near Greenfield.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

420.

Route 120 is from:

(a) Route 5 near Mossdale to the west boundary of Yosemite National Park via the vicinity of Manteca and Oakdale, and via Big Oak Flat and Buck Meadows.

(b) The east boundary of Yosemite National Park to Route 395 near Mono Lake. 

(c) Route 395 near Mono Lake to Route 6 near Benton Station.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

421.

Route 121 is from:

(a) Route 37 near Sears Point to Route 29 near Napa.

(b) Route 29 in Napa to Route 128.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 409, Sec. 47.)
-------------------------------------------

422.

Route 122 is from:

(a) Route 14 south of Palmdale to Route 138.

(b) Route 138 to Route 48.

(c) Route 48 northeasterly to Route 58.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1354.)
-------------------------------------------

423.

Route 123 is from Route 580 at San Pablo Avenue in Oakland to Route 80 in Richmond at Cutting Boulevard.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1187, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

424.

Route 124 is from:

(a) Route 88 south of Ione to Route 104.

(b) Route 104 to Route 16 near Waits Station.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

425.

Route 125 is from:

(a) Route 905 near Brown Field to Route 54.

(b) Route 54 to Route 94 near La Mesa.

(c) Route 94 near La Mesa to Route 56.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 928, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

426.

(a) Route 126 is from Route 101 near Ventura to Route 5.

(b) Route 126 shall be known and designated as the “Santa Paula Freeway.”

(c) The relinquished former portion of Route 126 within the City of Santa Clarita is not a state highway and is not eligible for adoption under Section 81.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 525, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

427.

Route 127 is from Route 15 near Baker to the Nevada state line via the vicinity of Death Valley Junction.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

428.

Route 128 is from:

(a) Route 1 near the mouth of the Navarro River to Route 101 near Cloverdale.

(b) Route 101 to Route 29 in Calistoga.

(c) Route 29 near Rutherford to Route 113 near Davis via Sage Canyon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1220, Sec. 40.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

429.

Route 129 is from Route 1 near Watsonville to Route 101 in San Benito County.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1243, Sec. 39.   Effective September 30, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

430.

(a) Route 130 is from the eastern city limit of the City of San Jose near Manning Avenue to Route 33 near Patterson via the vicinity of Mount Hamilton.

(b) The relinquished former portion of Route 130 within the City of San Jose is not a state highway and is not eligible for adoption under Section 81. For the relinquished former portion of Route 130, the City of San Jose shall maintain within its jurisdiction signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 130 and shall ensure the continuity of traffic flow on the relinquished former portion of Route 130, including any traffic signal progression.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 523, Sec. 15.   (SB 788)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

431.

(a) Route 131 is from Route 101 to Tiburon.

(b) Upon a determination by the commission that it is in the best interest of the state to do so, the commission may, upon terms and conditions approved by it, relinquish to the Town of Tiburon, the portion of Route 131 east of the intersection with Lyford Drive within the town limits of the Town of Tiburon, if the department and the town enter into an agreement providing for that relinquishment. The following conditions shall apply upon relinquishment:

(1) The relinquishment shall become effective on the date following the county recorder’s recordation of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(2) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, the relinquished portion of Route 131 shall cease to be a state highway.

(3) The portion of Route 131 relinquished under this subdivision shall be ineligible for future adoption under Section 81.

(4) The Town of Tiburon shall ensure the continuity of traffic flow on the relinquished portion of Route 131, including any traffic signal progression, to the extent applicable.

(5) For the portion of Route 131 relinquished under this subdivision, the Town of Tiburon shall install and maintain within its jurisdiction, signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 131 to the extent deemed necessary by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 43, Sec. 1.   (AB 747)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

432.

Route 132 is from:

(a) Route 580 west of Vernalis to Route 99 at Modesto.

(b) Route 99 to Route 49.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

433.

Route 133 is from Route 1 near Laguna Beach to Route 241.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1154, Sec. 47.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

433.1.

(a) Upon the commission determining that it is in the best interests of the state to do so, the commission may, upon terms and conditions it approves, relinquish to the City of Laguna Beach the portion of Route 133 that is located from Route 1 to El Toro Road if the department and the City of Laguna Beach enter into an agreement providing for that relinquishment.

(b) A relinquishment under this section shall become effective on the date following the county recorder’s recordation of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(c) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, all of the following shall
 occur:

(1) The relinquished portion of Route 133 shall cease to be a state highway.

(2) The relinquished portion of Route 133 shall be ineligible for future adoption under Section 81.

(3) The City of Laguna Beach shall ensure the continuity of traffic flow on the relinquished portion of Route 133, including, but not limited to, any traffic signal progression.

(4) For the relinquished portion of Route 133, the City of Laguna Beach shall maintain signs within its jurisdiction directing motorists to the continuation of Route 133.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 126, Sec. 1.   (AB 2172)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

434.

Route 134 is from Route 101 near Riverside Drive easterly to Route 210 via the vicinity of Glendale.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

435.

Route 135 is from:

(a) Route 101 near Los Alamos to Route 1 south of Orcutt.

(b) Route 1 near Orcutt to Route 101 in Santa Maria.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1243, Sec. 40.   Effective September 30, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

436.

Route 136 is from Route 395 near Lone Pine to Route 190 via Keeler.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

437.

Route 137 is from Route 43 near Corcoran to Route 65 near Lindsay via Tulare.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1371.)
-------------------------------------------

438.

(a) Route 138 is from:

(1) Route 5 near Gorman to Route 14 near the City of Lancaster.

(2) Route 14 near the City of Palmdale to Route 18 near Crestline.

(b) (1) Upon a determination by the commission that it is in the best interests of the state to do so, the commission may, upon terms and conditions approved by it, relinquish to the City of Palmdale all or a portion of Route 138 within its jurisdiction, if the department and the city enter into an agreement providing for that relinquishment.

(2) The following conditions apply upon relinquishment:

(A) The relinquishment shall become effective on the date following the county recorder’s recordation of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(B) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, the relinquished portion of Route 138 shall cease to be a state highway.

(C) The portion of Route 138 relinquished under this subdivision shall be ineligible for future adoption under Section 81.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 698, Sec. 1.   (AB 2082)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

439.

Route 139 is from:

(a) Route 36 in Susanville to Route 299 near Adin.

(b) Route 299 near Canby to the Oregon state line near Hatfield.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 292, Sec. 38.)
-------------------------------------------

440.

Route 140 is from:

(a) Route 5 near Gustine to Route 99 near Merced.

(b) Route 99 near Merced to Yosemite National Park near El Portal via Mariposa.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1354.)
-------------------------------------------

442.

Route 142 is from:

(a) Route 90 near Brea to Route 71 near Chino.

(b) Route 71 near Chino to Route 210 near Upland.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 724, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

443.

Route 143 is from Route 99 near Elk Grove to Route 244 near Carmichael.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1372.)
-------------------------------------------

444.

(a) Route 144 is from Alameda Padre Serra in Santa Barbara to Route 192 via Sycamore Canyon Road.

(b) Upon a determination by the commission that it is in the best interests of the state to do so, the commission may, upon terms and conditions approved by it, relinquish Route 144 to the City of Santa Barbara, if the city has agreed to accept it. The relinquishment shall be effective on the day immediately following the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until the date the relinquishment authorized under subdivision (b) becomes effective, and as of that date is
 repealed, unless a later enacted statute, which is enacted on or before that date, deletes or extends that date.

(d) The relinquished former portion of Route 144 in the City of Santa Barbara between Route 101 and Alameda Padre Serra is not a state highway and is not eligible for adoption under Section 81. For that relinquished former portion of Route 144, the City of Santa Barbara shall maintain signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 144.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 491, Sec. 26.   (SB 1318)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Repealed as of date prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

445.

(a) Route 145 is from:

(1) Route 5 near Oilfields to Route 99 near Madera, passing near Five Points and Kerman.

(2) Route 99 near Madera to Route 41. 

(b) (1) The commission may relinquish to the City of Madera the portion of Route 145 located between Gateway Drive and Lake Street within the city, upon terms and conditions the commission finds to be in the best interest of the state.

(2) A relinquishment under this subdivision shall become effective on the first day of the next calendar or fiscal year, whichever occurs first, after the effective date of the commission’s approval of the terms.

(3) The relinquished section shall cease to be a state highway on the effective date of the relinquishment.

(4) The portion of Route 145 described in this subdivision may be relinquished to the City of Madera only upon the condition that the city agrees to both of the following:

(A) Maintenance of signs directing motorists to the continuation of State Highway Route 145.

(B) No reduction of the number of lanes within the relinquished section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 540, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

446.

(a) Route 146 is from:

(1) Route 101 near Soledad to Pinnacles National Monument.

(2) Pinnacles National Monument to Route 25 in Bear Valley.
